Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-908
Revised privacy notice; when required.

(1) Except as otherwise authorized in the Privacy of Insurance Consumer Information Act, a licensee shall not, directly or through an affiliate, disclose any nonpublic personal financial information about a consumer to a nonaffiliated third party other than as described in the initial notice that the licensee provided to that consumer under section 44-904 unless:

(a) The licensee has provided to the consumer a clear and conspicuous revised notice that accurately describes its policies and practices;

(b) The licensee has provided to the consumer a new opt out notice;

(c) The licensee has given the consumer a reasonable opportunity, before the licensee discloses the information to the nonaffiliated third party, to opt out of the disclosure; and

(d) The consumer does not opt out.

(2) When a licensee is required to deliver a revised privacy notice by this section, the licensee shall deliver it according to section 44-909.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 8.